test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-esa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - êsa - ok : # -m animate noun, shell
     êsa+N+AN+Sg: êsa
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitêsim
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitêsim
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otêsima
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otêsimiyiwa
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitêsiminân
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitêsiminaw
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitêsimiwâw
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otêsimiwâwa
     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otêsimiyiwa

     êsa+N+AN+Pl: êsak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitêsimak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitêsimak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otêsima
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otêsimiyiwa
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitêsiminânak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitêsiminawak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitêsimiwâwak
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otêsimiwâwa
     êsa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otêsimiyiwa

     êsa+N+AN+Sg+Obv: êsa
     êsa+N+AN+Loc: êsihk
     êsa+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitêsimihk
     êsa+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitêsimihk
     êsa+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otêsimihk
     êsa+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otêsimiyihk
     êsa+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitêsiminâhk
     êsa+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitêsiminâhk
     êsa+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitêsimiwâhk
     êsa+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otêsimiwâhk
     êsa+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otêsimiyihk

     êsa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [êsis, êsisis]
     êsa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [êsisak, êsisisak]
     êsa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [êsisihk, êsisisihk]

     êsa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicêsimisiwâw
     êsa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocêsimisiwâwa
